District of Columbia statutes.
43-103

Burial ground to be platted and surveyed.

They shall cause the land designed as a burial ground to be surveyed and platted, and a plat of the ground so surveyed shall be recorded in the Office of the Surveyor of the District. Each lot shall be duly numbered by the Surveyor and such number shall be marked on the plat and recorded.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1294, ch. 854, § 660

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 27-103.
1973 Ed., § 27-103.